Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 1. In General

§ 37-7-101.
Formation; petition for organization.

Whenever a majority of the freeholders on lands and entrymen upon public lands in any district who shall represent at least one-third of the area of lands within said district which desire to provide for the purchase of electric power for use in electrifying the lands within said district or to purchase, extend, operate, or maintain consecutive power lines; or to cooperate with the United States, the state of Wyoming, or any subdivision thereof, they shall procure a certificate of necessity from the public service commission of the state of Wyoming, and file in the district court of the county which embraces the largest acreage of the district a petition hereinafter referred to as the “petition” which shall include:

The name of the proposed power district;

The necessity of the proposed work, describing the necessity and attaching such certificate of necessity issued by the public service commission thereto;

The object and purpose of the system to be constructed together with a general description thereof;

The names of all freeholders holding lands and the entrymen on public lands in said district when known;

Whether or not the petitioners desire and propose to cooperate with the United States, the state of Wyoming or any subdivision thereof;

A general prayer for the organization of the district.

No petition having as many signers as are required by this section shall be declared void, but the court may at any time permit the petition to be amended in form and substance to conform to the facts, if the facts justify the organization of the power district. Several similar petitions for the organization of the same district may be circulated, and when filed, shall together be regarded as one petition having as many signers as there are separate signers on the several petitions filed. All petitions for the organization of said district filed prior to the hearing on said petition shall be considered by the court, the same as if filed with the first petition placed on file, and the signatures thereon contained shall be counted in determining whether sufficient persons have signed said petition.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 87-101; C.S. 1945, § 62-101; W.S. 1957, § 37-72.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision that no electric light line shall be constructed within the limits of any municipal organization without the consent of its local authorities, see art. 13, § 4, Wyo. Const.

For provision prohibiting loans on credit or donations by state or any political subdivision thereof in requiring two-thirds vote of people for work of internal improvement, see art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const.

As to public irrigation in power districts generally, see §§

41-7-801

to

41-7-819

.

As to change of public irrigation and power district to irrigation district, see §§

41-7-830

to

41-7-835

.

As to change of irrigation district to irrigation and public power district, see §§

41-7-850

to

41-7-865

.

Acts read together. —

Acts of 1931 and 1933 concerning organization of power districts must be read together as though passed as single act. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

Authority of district. —

No authority exists under present law for power district to purchase city electric light plant and issue revenue bonds for payment thereof, nor to include municipality within the district. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

“Necessity.” —

Under many decisions the word “necessity” has been construed to mean no more than “expedient,” “convenient,” or “useful to the public.” In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

Necessity of district. —

Since question of necessity must be alleged in petition and court shall pass upon all material issues raised by petition, court in passing on application for creation of power district must pass on question of its necessity. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

Powers conferred. —

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 1 (§

37-7-201

), confers no power upon power district not conferred by this section except power to issue revenue bonds. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

Procedure under new act. —

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 51, § 1 (§

37-7-201

), contemplates that petition for creation of power district shall be filed under this section, which controls as respects procedure to be followed in formation of district. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

Purchase of existing plant. —

Though purpose of proposed power district is to take over existing plant and not to construct new one, certificate of necessity from public service commission is nevertheless required. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

Purpose of acts. —

Whole purpose of 1931 and 1933 acts was to provide method by which rural communities could acquire electric light and power by community action. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

Signatures. —

This section requires application for certificate of necessity be signed by petitioners for creation of district and not by proposed district which has no legal entity until created by court. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

§ 37-7-102.
Lands need not be contiguous; benefits to exceed damages and costs; must be cheaper as single district.

The lands proposed to be included in any power district need not be contiguous, provided that the benefits of the proposed work in each part will exceed the damages from and costs of said proposed work in each part; and provided, further, that the court shall be satisfied that said proposed work can be more cheaply done if in a single district than otherwise.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 87-102; C.S. 1945, § 62-102; W.S. 1957, § 37-73.

§ 37-7-103.
Time and place of hearing on petition; notice.

On such petition being filed the court or judge thereof shall make an order fixing the time and place of the hearing thereon and ordering notice; thereupon the clerk of said county, for the county in which the proceedings are instituted, shall cause twenty (20) days notice of the filing of such petition to be given.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 87-103; C.S. 1945, § 62-103; W.S. 1957, § 37-74.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices generally, see §§

1-6-201

to

1-6-204

.

§ 37-7-104.
Contests and objections at hearing; notices of contest or objection; court to hear and determine issues.

On the day fixed for hearing on such petitions all persons owning or entitled to the possession of lands, or any interest or easement in land, within said proposed district, or who would be affected thereby, may appear and contest or object to:

The sufficiency of the petition;

The sufficiency of the signers of the petition;

The sufficiency of the notice;

The constitutionality of the law;

The inclusion or exclusion of any lands in the district, or any other material issue raised by the petition;

The jurisdiction of the court, specifying their objections to such jurisdiction.

The petitioners and contestants may, on the trial, offer any competent evidence in regard thereto. All notices of contest or objection shall be in writing and shall clearly specify the grounds of contest or objection and shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the court [prior] to the date fixed for said hearing. The court shall on the day fixed for said hearing, hear and determine all issues provided in this section and may adjourn said hearing from time to time, for good and sufficient reasons shown.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 87-105; C.S. 1945, § 62-105; W.S. 1957, § 37-75.

§ 37-7-105.
Nonresident landowners to be specified on affidavit with petition; notice by mail; personal service to establish jurisdiction.

If any of the persons owning or entitled to possession of land in said district are nonresidents of the county or counties in which the proposed district lies, the petition shall be accompanied by an affidavit giving the names and post-office address of each such nonresident, if such are known, and if unknown shall state that, upon diligent inquiry their names or post-office addresses (whichever may be the fact) cannot be ascertained. The clerk of the court shall mail a copy of the notice aforesaid to each of said nonresident owners whose post-office address is known, within six (6) days after the first publication of the same. The certificate of the clerk of the court, or other public officer, or the affidavit of any other person who knows the facts, affixed to a copy of said notice, shall be sufficient evidence of the posting, serving, mailing or publication thereof. Personal service of said notice on (or service by leaving at the last usual place of abode of) all persons owning or entitled to possession of lands or interest in lands within said district, shall give the court complete jurisdiction, without posting, publication or mailing of said notice.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 87-104; C.S. 1945, § 62-104; W.S. 1957, § 37-76.

Cross references. —

As to service of process generally, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

“Necessity.” —

Under many decisions the word “necessity” has been construed to mean no more than “expedient,” “convenient” or “useful to the public.” In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

Necessity of district. —

Since question of necessity must be alleged in petition and court shall pass upon all material issues raised by petition, court in passing on application for creation of power district must pass on question of its necessity. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

§ 37-7-106.
Affidavit of signers evidence of facts therein.

The affidavit of any three (3) or more of the signers of said petition stating that they have examined it and are acquainted with the locality of said district and that said petition is signed by a sufficient number of corporations and adult persons owning lands in said district, to satisfy section 1 hereof [§

37-7-101

], may be taken by the court or judge as sufficient evidence of the facts therein stated.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 87-106; C.S. 1945, § 62-106; W.S. 1957, § 37-77.

§ 37-7-107.
Transfer of lands to establish or defeat petition; filing of petition lis pendens against lands therein.

All deeds made for the purpose of establishing or defeating the prayer of said petition, and not made in good faith and for a valuable consideration, shall be taken and held to be a fraud, and the holders thereof shall not be considered as the owners of the lands described therein; and the filing of said petition shall constitute a lis pendens against all lands described therein, from and after the filing thereof.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 87-107; C.S. 1945, § 62-107; W.S. 1957, § 37-78.

§ 37-7-108.
Petition dismissed for improper signatures; costs; court to include or exclude lands from district.

If the court or presiding judge thereof, after hearing any and all competent evidence that may be offered for and against the said petition, shall find that the same has not been signed as herein required, the said petition shall be dismissed at the cost of the petitioners, and judgment shall be entered against said petitioners for the amount of said costs. The court shall upon proper showing include or exclude any land from the district.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 87-108; C.S. 1945, § 62-108; W.S. 1957, § 37-79.

§ 37-7-109.
Order of court upon decision for petitioners; appointment of commissioners; findings and orders final unless appealed.

If the issues at this hearing are decided in favor of the petitioners, the court shall make an order:

Approving and confirming the petition;

Defining the boundaries of the district;

Establishing said district as a corporation by the name proposed with powers:

To sue and be sued;

To adopt and use a corporate seal;

To have perpetual succession;

To build or otherwise acquire power lines and the transformers and other electrical equipment necessary to connect with power lines of the United States, the state of Wyoming, or any subdivision thereof to transmit power to any and all persons deciding to use same;

To exercise the power of eminent domain as provided by the laws of the state of Wyoming.

Appointing three (3) commissioners from such districts who shall be freeholders or entrymen upon public lands in said district.

The commissioners appointed by the court shall at all times be under the direction of the court and may be removed from office by the court upon good cause shown; provided, however, no commissioner shall be removed until written charges specifying the grounds upon which such removal is sought are filed and an opportunity given such commissioner to be heard at a hearing provided. In case a commissioner has been removed under this provision the court shall immediately appoint a successor.

All findings and orders of the court made at the hearing herein provided for shall be final and conclusive unless appealed from to the supreme court within thirty (30) days after filing thereof.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 87-109; C.S. 1945, § 62-109; W.S. 1957, § 37-80; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to eminent domain generally, see §§

1-26-501

to

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iii)(D) substituted “acquire” for “require.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2006 amendment,

made a grammatical change in (a)(iv).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Authority of district. —

No authority exists under present law for power district to purchase city electric light plant and issue revenue bonds for payment thereof, nor to include municipality within the district. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

§ 37-7-110.
Oath and bond of commissioners; quorum; majority rule; term of office.

Before entering upon their duties, such commissioners shall take and subscribe an oath to support the constitution of the United States and the constitution of the state of Wyoming, to faithfully and impartially discharge their duties as such commissioners and to render a true account of their doings to the court by which they are appointed whenever required by law or the order of the court, and shall execute a bond running to the clerk of said court and his successors in office as obligees, to be filed with said clerk for the benefit of the parties interested, in an amount to be fixed by the court or presiding judge, and with sureties to be approved by the court or presiding judge, conditioned for the faithful discharge of their duties as such commissioners and the faithful accounting of all moneys which shall come into their hands as such commissioners. A majority shall constitute a quorum and a concurrence of a majority in any matter within their duties shall be sufficient to its determination. The commissioners appointed shall hold their office until the first Tuesday in the second succeeding December following the date of order organizing such district and until their respective successors are qualified.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 10; R.S. 1931, § 87-110; C.S. 1945, § 62-110; W.S. 1957, § 37-81.

§ 37-7-111.
Records of commissioners; annual statement; compensation and expenses; suit upon bonds.

The commissioners shall keep an accurate record of all moneys collected on account of the work under their charge and of all payments made by them and shall take vouchers of such payments and shall keep full, accurate and true minutes of all their proceedings. On the first day of November each year they shall file in the office of the clerk of the court having jurisdiction in the matter an itemized statement of all their receipts and disbursements, and leave said report in such office for examination by parties interested at all times; and include a copy thereof in the regular call for the annual meeting hereinafter provided. They shall receive for their services such compensation as the court or presiding judge thereof may determine. They shall also be reimbursed for their actual reasonable expenses. Suit may also be brought upon their bonds, and the amount recovered shall be applied to the construction of the work or to the party injured, as justice may require.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 11; R.S. 1931, § 87-111; C.S. 1945, § 62-111; W.S. 1957, § 37-82.

§ 37-7-112.
Commissioners to constitute corporate authority; organization; powers of board.

The commissioners appointed as aforesaid and their successors in office shall, from the entry of such order of confirmation constitute the corporate authority of said power district, and shall exercise the power conferred on them by law. They shall organize a board, elect a president from their number and appoint a secretary-treasurer. The board shall have power, and it shall be their duty to adopt bylaws, manage and conduct the affairs and business of the district, make and execute all necessary contracts, employ such agents, attorneys, officers and employees as may be required and prescribe their duties; to purchase electric current for light, heat and power purposes; to purchase, construct or otherwise acquire, power lines, transformers and other electrical equipment necessary to conduct and transmit such electric current to various people of the district who desire to use such electric current.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 12; R.S. 1931, § 87-112; C.S. 1945, § 62-112; W.S. 1957, § 37-83.

Authority of district. —

No authority exists under present law for power district to purchase city electric light plant and issue revenue bonds for payment thereof, nor to include municipality within the district. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

§ 37-7-113.
Duties of commissioners as to proposed work; report to court.

As soon as may be after the organization of said district or within such time as the court may direct, said commissioners shall proceed to have all necessary surveys made and shall lay out said proposed work making a map thereof, and plans and other specifications thereof, and report in writing to the court:

The extent and character of the proposed work;

If it be found necessary to change the boundaries of the said proposed district, previously fixed, they shall report said proposed change, and, if possible, shall report the names, the residence and post-office addresses of the owners or persons entitled to possession of all lands affected by said change in boundaries, but no such change in boundaries, shall be made as to deprive the court of jurisdiction; provided, however, that if the owners and those entitled to possession, by virtue of public land filing, of lands adjacent to the district, petition to have their lands brought into the district, such petitioners may be considered the same as the original petitioners in making changes of boundaries;

What lands within the district, as by them reported, will be injured by the proposed work, if any, and they shall therein award to each tract, lot, easement or interest by whomsoever held the amount of damages which they shall determine will be caused to the same by the proposed work;

All lands within the district as by them reported will be benefited by the proposed work and they shall assess against such lands by whomsoever held the amount of benefits which they determine will be caused to the same by the proposed work. The benefits so assessed are herein referred to as “the assessment roll”;

They shall also determine and report to the court the total itemized amount as near as they can determine, that said proposed work will cost, including organization expenses and the unit cost upon which the assessments are based, which shall be designated as “cost of construction”;

The cost of construction which shall be assessed to the various tracts of land within said district in proportion to the assessed valuation of each of such tracts of land as such valuation was last fixed and determined by the county assessor and county board of equalization of the county in which said lands are situated.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 13; R.S. 1931, § 87-113; C.S. 1945, § 62-113; W.S. 1957, § 37-84.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Authority of district. —

No authority exists under present law for power district to purchase city electric light plant and issue revenue bonds for payment thereof, nor to include municipality within the district. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

§ 37-7-114.
Notice and hearing on report of commissioners.

Upon the filing of said report, the court or judge thereof shall make and enter an order fixing the time and place when and where all persons interested may appear and remonstrate against the confirmation thereof, and the clerk of said court shall cause notice of the time and place of such hearing to be given to all parties interested which notice shall contain a brief description of the lands benefited and damaged, together with the net damage awarded the several tracts, parcels, easements and corporations to which damages are awarded, and the sum in each case assessed for benefits, and cost of construction against said several benefited parcels, tracts, easements and corporations, and the benefits apportioned to each parcel, tract, easement or corporation in the district. Said notice shall be published at least three (3) successive weeks, prior to the day set for the hearing in one newspaper published in each county in which said lands, or any part thereof within said district are situate (and if no newspaper is published in said county, in some newspaper in an adjoining county), and by serving a copy of such notice on each of the persons, or corporations, by said report recommended, to be assessed, or whose lands are by said report recommended to be included in said district and who resides in any of the counties in which any lands of the proposed district are situated, at least twelve (12) days before the day of hearing in the same manner that a summons is required to be served; provided, absence from the county of such person or corporation shall excuse personal service, whereupon due publication of such notice shall be sufficient service.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 14; R.S. 1931, § 87-114; C.S. 1945, § 62-114; W.S. 1957, § 37-85.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notices generally, see §§

1-6-201

to

1-6-204

.

Authority of district. —

No authority exists under present law for power district to purchase city electric light plant and issue revenue bonds for payment thereof, nor to include municipality within the district. In re Sheridan County Power Dist., 61 Wyo. 365, 157 P.2d 997,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1945).

§ 37-7-115.
Notice when lands situate in more than one county.

In case the lands are situated in more than one county the notice published in the county wherein the court having jurisdiction is situated shall contain a description of all the lands in said proposed district [with] the damages awarded to the several parcels thereof, but the notice published in any other county or counties may contain a description of only the lands situate in said county for which said publication is made, together with the damages awarded to and assessments for benefits against the several tracts, parcels, easements and interests situate in said county for which publication is made. In case of service of said notice personally, or the acceptance and waiver thereof of all the owners of the lands within the district, said service shall be sufficient and give the court jurisdiction without said publication.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 15; R.S. 1931, § 87-115; C.S. 1945, § 62-115; W.S. 1957, § 37-86.

§ 37-7-116.
Modification of report by order of court.

If the court finds that the report requires modification, the same may by order of the court be referred back to the commissioners, who may be required to modify it in any respect.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 16; R.S. 1931, § 87-116; C.S. 1945, § 62-116; W.S. 1957, § 37-87.

§ 37-7-117.
Order of confirmation of report or modified report; effect of confirmation; appeal.

If there be no remonstrance, or if the finding be in favor of the validity of the proceedings, or after the report shall have been modified to conform to the findings, the court shall confirm the report and the order of confirmation shall be final and conclusive, the proposed work shall be established and authorized, and the proposed assessments approved and confirmed unless within thirty (30) days an appeal be taken to the supreme court, and the said order of confirmation shall also fix the commissioner’s bond.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 17; R.S. 1931, § 87-117; C.S. 1945, § 62-117; W.S. 1957, § 37-88.

§ 37-7-118.
Petitions regarding orders of confirmation; supplemental report from commissioners.

Said order of confirmation may, at the same or at any subsequent term of said court be revised, modified or changed, in whole or in part, on petition of the commissioners, after such notice as the court may require to parties interested. At any time prior to making the order confirming said report or thereafter, the court may permit the commissioners to present and file a supplemental report, or amend their report, as to any matter which, pursuant to the provisions hereof, was or might have been included in the original report presented by them, and after reasonable notice given to all parties interested, in such manner as the court shall direct, the court may, upon the hearing in said matter make such order as the case may require.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 18; R.S. 1931, § 87-118; C.S. 1945, § 62-118; W.S. 1957, § 37-89.

§ 37-7-119.
Assessment for construction; time of payment; interest.

At the time of the confirmation of such assessments, it shall be competent for the court to order the assessment for construction to be paid in not more than twenty (20) installments, of such amounts and at such times as will be convenient for the accomplishment of the proposed work, or for the payment of principal and interest of such notes or bonds of said district, as the court shall grant authority to issue for the construction of said work. The court may also, by such order, fix a date on which the first installment of the assessments of construction shall become due, not more than five (5) years after the date of the order, and each of said installments shall draw interest at a rate not to exceed seven percent (7%) per annum from the date of said order.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 19; R.S. 1931, § 87-119; C.S. 1945, § 62-119; W.S. 1957, § 37-90.

Cross references. —

As to legal rate of interest, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 37-7-120.
Assessments due at same time as taxes; budget to be filed and approved by court; expenditures in excess of budget; unauthorized debts void.

Assessments to meet expenses of any current year of any district shall become due, payable and delinquent at such time or times each year as may be fixed by law for state and county taxes to become due, payable and delinquent. Commissioners having charge of any power district shall on or before the first Tuesday of June of each year file with the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of such district, a report showing an itemized estimate of the money to be raised by assessment within the district for the purpose of constructing new work, maintenance, and to meet the yearly current expenses of the district. In addition to the amount above provided, the commissioners may add a sum which in their judgment shall be sufficient to provide for possible delinquencies. Within thirty (30) days after filing such annual report, at a time and place to be fixed by the court or a judge thereof, the judge shall examine such report, hear all objections thereto, fix and determine the amount to be raised by assessments for the current year and cause such adjudication to be entered of record in said court and a certified copy thereof to be delivered to the commissioners of such district. The commissioners shall add thereto such amount as may be necessary to meet the principal and interest on lawful indebtedness of the district maturing during the current year, together with a sum which in their judgment shall be sufficient to provide for possible delinquencies. When thus completed it shall be known as “The Budget of . . . . . District for the year (year)” and also be verified under oath by any one of the commissioners.

The commissioners of any power district within the state of Wyoming are hereby forbidden to incur any indebtedness for the current expenses of the district in excess of the amount provided in the budget. Provided, however, in case a greater sum than that provided in the budget is required, the commissioners may file a petition setting forth the causes therefor, with the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of said district. Immediately upon the filing of said petition the court shall make an order fixing the time and place of hearing and directing the form and manner of notice thereof to be given if the court deem such hearing advisable. If the court shall authorize the expenditure of a greater sum of money the commissioners shall be authorized to incur indebtedness equal to the amount of the additional sum authorized by the court, and in case the expenditure occurs at a time when it is too late to place the amount upon the assessment roll for the current year such amounts may be added to the budget of ensuing years. All debts contracted in contravention of this section shall be void.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 20; R.S. 1931, § 87-120; C.S. 1945, § 62-120; W.S. 1957, § 37-91; Laws 1999, ch. 150, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to time of payment of taxes generally, see §

39-13-108

.

§ 37-7-121.
Preparation of assessment roll; assessments based on county assessments; commissioners to verify; levy of assessments; assessments to extend to tax roll.

It shall be the duty of the commissioners of each power district on or before the third Monday in July in each year to prepare an assessment roll of said district which shall contain the name of the owner together with the description of each lot, tract and easement of land within said district and the aggregate assessment of benefits confirmed by the court against the same. Assessments to meet the current expense of a power district for any year shall be proportioned upon the assessed valuation of the several benefited lots, tracts and easements in the district as such valuation was last fixed for assessment purposes by the county assessor and county board of equalization of the county in which the same are situated. The assessment roll shall also show the amount assessed against each lot, tract, and easement of land in the district to meet the principal and interest or the indebtedness of the district for the current year. When such assessment roll is completed it shall be signed by the commissioners of said district and verified by any one of them. The county commissioners of said county upon the receipt of the assessment roll of said district and at the time of making the requisite tax levy for county purposes, shall levy and assess against each lot, tract, and easement of land the respective amounts levied and assessed against the same on said assessment roll. Thereupon the county commissioners shall certify to and deliver said assessment roll to the county assessor of such county and in case the territory embraced in such district is located in two (2) or more counties a copy of the assessment roll as certified to by the county commissioners of the county having jurisdiction of such district shall be delivered to the assessor of each county in which any of the land of the district is located. Upon receipt of the assessment roll the assessors of the counties embracing any of the lands of such district, shall extend upon the tax roll of such county the respective amounts levied and assessed against each lot, tract, and easement of land, and against each corporation as shown by said assessment roll of said district.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 21; R.S. 1931, § 87-121; C.S. 1945, § 62-121; W.S. 1957, § 37-92.

§ 37-7-122.
County treasurer to collect taxes; interest coupons or bonds of district authorized for payment of district bond taxes; duty of county commissioners as to unpaid taxes.

It shall be the duty of the county treasurer of each county in which any power district is located in whole or in part to collect and receipt for all taxes levied as herein provided in the same manner as is required in the receipt for and collection of taxes upon real estate for county purposes. The county treasurer in case of taxes heretofore or hereafter levied as herein provided shall receive in payment of the district bond taxes above mentioned for the year in which said taxes were levied, interest coupons or bonds of said power districts maturing within said year the same as so much lawful money in the United States. Provided, however, that in the case of the nonpayment of any taxes which have heretofore or may hereafter be levied as above provided, the board of county commissioners upon application made shall have the power and it shall be their duty, upon written request of the board of such power district, to order the said treasurer to receive in full payment of the bond fund portion of said taxes the principal amount of said taxes levied, payable in bonds or bond interest coupons of said power district at their face value, and maturing within the year in which said tax levies were made, as so much lawful money of the United States.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 22; R.S. 1931, § 87-122; C.S. 1945, § 62-122; W.S. 1957, § 37-93.

§ 37-7-123.
Inspection and repair of power lines.

The commissioners and agents, servants and employees shall have the right to go upon all lands along any power line to inspect and repair the same whenever necessary, doing no unnecessary damage, and shall not be liable for trespass therefor.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 23; R.S. 1931, § 87-123; C.S. 1945, § 62-123; W.S. 1957, § 37-94.

Cross references. —

As to knowing injury to or destruction of property, see §

6-3-201

.

§ 37-7-124.
Necessary additional assessments authorized under court order; notice required; payment.

If any assessment for construction, operation, maintenance or repair that the commissioners shall have reported to the court is a smaller sum than is needed to carry out the purpose for which said assessment has been made or if in any year an additional sum is necessary to pay the interest on lawful indebtedness of said power districts, further or additional assessments on the lands benefited shall be made by the commissioners of said power district under the order of the court or presiding judge thereof, upon such notice as the court or judge may direct, which further or additional assessment may be made payable in installments as specified herein and shall be treated and collected in the same manner as the original assessments confirmed by the court in said power district.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 24; R.S. 1931, § 87-124; C.S. 1945, § 62-124; W.S. 1957, § 37-95.

§ 37-7-125.
Omission of assessments not to affect jurisdiction of court or render previous assessments voidable; commissioners to correct omissions and report to court.

Omission to assess benefits, or to assess for construction, or to make additional assessment or to make assessment for operation, maintenance or repairs against any land or person which should have been assessed, or to award damages to any one or more tracts of land or assessments in a power district shall neither affect the jurisdiction of the court to confirm the report, nor to render the benefits assessed or the assessments for construction, or additional assessments, or assessments for operation, maintenance, or repairs against other lands or assessments against any person voidable, but the commissioners of said power district shall thereafter, as soon as they discover the omission or receive notice thereof, either agree with the omitted parties upon the proper award or assessments and award the damages or make such assessments of benefits or assessments for construction, operation, maintenance or repair, and make such additional assessments against the omitted lands and corporations and award such damages as shall be just, and report the facts, together with such assessments and awards, to the court.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 127, § 25; R.S. 1931, § 87-125; C.S. 1945, § 62-125; W.S. 1957, § 37-96.